Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 59, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 59. a. Develop and administer a seal of biliteracy program to recognize students graduating from high school who have demonstrated proficiency in two or more world languages, one of which may be American sign language, though one of which must be English. Participation in the program by a school district, attendance center, or accredited nonpublic school shall be voluntary. The department shall work with stakeholders to identify standardized tests that may be utilized to demonstrate proficiency. The department shall produce a seal of biliteracy, which may include but need not be limited to a sticker that may be affixed to a studentâs high school transcript or a certificate that may be awarded to the student. A participating school district or school shall notify the department of the names of the students who have qualified for the seal and the department shall provide the school district or school with the appropriate number of seals or other authorized endorsement. The department may charge a nominal fee to cover printing and postage charges related to issuance of the biliteracy seal under this subsection paragraph . House File 2231, p. 2 b. Develop and administer a seal of civics excellence program to recognize students graduating from high school who have demonstrated proficiency in civics. The department shall determine the minimum requirements necessary for a student to obtain a civics seal, including knowledge of American government and participation in civic and community activities. The department shall produce a civics seal, which may include a sticker which may be affixed to a studentâs high school transcript or a certificate awarded to the student. A seal of civics excellence may be affixed to the diploma and noted on the transcript of a student to recognize that the student has achieved excellence in civics. Participation in the program by a school district or accredited nonpublic school shall be voluntary. A participating school district or accredited nonpublic school shall notify the department of the names of students who have qualified for a seal, and the department shall provide the school district or accredited nonpublic school with the appropriate number of seals or other authorized endorsement. The department may charge a nominal fee to cover printing and postal charges related to the issuance of the civics seal under this paragraph. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2231, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor